Connecticut, session 2026, SB00244.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) The Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall conduct a study concerning the market
for certificates issued by the New England Power Pool Generation
Information System. The study shall include, but need not be limited to,
(1) the role of such certificates in supporting the development, financing
and continued operation of renewable energy resources in the state and
the region, (2) the current supply, demand and pricing trends for such
certificates in the state and in regional markets, including markets
administered by the regional independent system operator, as defined
in section 16-1 of the general statutes, and (3) the extent to which such
certificates, when used for compliance with state renewable energy
requirements, demonstrate benefits in environmental protection,
electric-grid resiliency or any other identified benefits to the state. Not
later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a report on the
results of such study, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to energy and
technology and the environment.
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 244
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In the last sentence, "on the results of such study" was added for clarity.
ET Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2